New York, session 2025-2026, S1539.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 19-159.9 to read as follows: 3 § 19-159.9 Notification of bicycle lane or rack construction or 4 removal. a. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms 5 shall have the following meanings: 6 1. "Affected council member" means the council member or members whose 7 districts would contain a proposed bicycle lane or bicycle rack that is 8 to be constructed or removed. 9 2. "Affected community board" means a community board or boards whose 10 districts would contain a proposed bicycle lane or bicycle rack that is 11 to be constructed or removed. 12 3. "Bicycle lane" means a portion of the roadway that has been marked 13 off or separated for the preferential or exclusive use of bicycles. 14 4. "Bicycle rack" means a fixed-in-place stand, solidly anchored to 15 the ground or other fixed object, which allows a bicycle to lean against 16 it in an upright position with both wheels on a level surface. 17 b. When the department intends to construct or remove a bicycle lane 18 or bicycle rack, the department shall provide notice through electronic 19 and written means to the affected council member of the affected council 20 district, the state senator of the affected senate district, the member 21 of the assembly of the affected assembly district and the district 22 manager of the affected community board prior to the construction or 23 removal of such lane or rack. Such notice shall be provided at least EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02369-01-5 S. 1539 2 1 ninety days before the department constructs or removes such lane or 2 rack. 3 c. The department shall present its plan at a public hearing held by 4 an affected community board within forty-five days of the department 5 sending the notice required under subdivision b of this section. If 6 changes are made to such plan, it shall present the plan again at a 7 public hearing within forty-five days. The community shall be allowed to 8 provide input on such plans and the department shall not construct or 9 remove a bicycle lane or bicycle rack until forty-five days after the 10 final public hearing. 11 d. The department shall consider comments from any public hearings and 12 may incorporate changes, where appropriate, into its bicycle lane or 13 bicycle rack plan or cancel plans for construction or removal of such 14 lane or rack if it determines that such lane or rack would be inappro- 15 priate. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.